Louisiana, session 2026, HB104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3357 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
A. Each public postsecondary education management board may develop
and implement a phased retirement program, referred to in this Section as a
"program", for institutions under its management and supervision for the purpose of
supporting faculty and staff recruitment and retention, facilitating institutional
knowledge transfer, and promoting strategic succession planning.
B. If a management board opts to exercise this authority, it shall adopt a
policy for this purpose which shall address the specific operational and institutional
needs of the applicable system and institutions and provide for, at a minimum, all of
the following:
(1) A provision that participation in the program is voluntary on the part of
an employee.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-472 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 104
(2) A definition of eligible employee with respect to program participation,
which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) He is eligible for retirement as provided in R.S. 11:761 at the time that
he begins participating in the program.
(b) He has a minimum of ten years of collective service at a public
postsecondary education institution in Louisiana, whether consecutive or
nonconsecutive.
(c) He has reached the age of fifty-nine and one-half years or older.
(3) An employee participation period of not less than twelve months and not
more than thirty-six months.
(4)(a) A requirement that a written memorandum of understanding be
executed between the public postsecondary education system or institution and the
employee that specifies workload, schedule, and program expectations.
(b) A requirement that the memorandum of understanding be approved by
the institution's human resources officer, chief academic officer, and chief fiscal
officer, as applicable.
(5) A requirement that participant workload be no less than fifty percent
effort during program participation.
(6) A requirement for formal written acknowledgment by the employee of
all program terms and conditions.
C. Each management board may adopt a program policy as provided in this
Section prior to July 1, 2027, but shall not begin actual implementation of a program
prior to that date.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a management
board, in addition to the policy provided for in this Section, from adopting guidance
or implementation measures with respect to a phased retirement program that are
consistent with the provisions of this Section and other applicable law.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-472 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 104
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 42 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
enacted and becomes effective.